California, session 20252026, SB1299.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 1.6 (commencing with Section 13191) is added to Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 1.6. State Fire Marshal Fire Suppression Education and Training Safety Act Article 1. Title and Purpose13191. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the State Fire Marshal Fire Suppression Education and Training Safety Act.13191.1. The purpose of this act is to improve the performance and reliability of water- and chemical-based fire suppression systems by providing a means to certify and register any person who installs, alters, repairs, inspects, tests, maintains, performs safe-off, or adds appurtenances to those systems. Article 2. Definitions13191.2. Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions apply for purposes of this chapter:(a) “Alteration” means a modification or an addition to an existing water-based or chemical-based fire suppression system.(b) “Applicable provisions of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 920) of Division 1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations” means those provisions of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 920) of Division 1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations that correspond to the particular subject referenced in this act, as those provisions read on January 1, 2026, or subsequent amendments to those provisions.(c) “Apprentice” means a person learning by practical experience under the direction of skilled workers, and who is currently registered in a State of California or federally approved fire sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program.(d) “Certified fire sprinkler fitter” means an individual who has been issued a valid certified fire sprinkler fitter card issued by the State Fire Marshal.(e) “Certified fire sprinkler fitter card” means a card issued by the Office of the State Fire Marshal to a certified fire sprinkler fitter upon verification of meeting the requirements in Article 7 (commencing with Section 13191.7). (f) “Commercial certification” means a certification allowing individuals to perform the installation of fire suppression systems in any occupancy. (g) “Correction order” means a written direction or command, delivered by a fire official, identifying a required correction.(h) “Directly supervise” means that the supervising certified fire sprinkler fitter is physically present, onsite, with the assigned registered apprentice fire sprinkler fitter or trainee.(i) “Fire suppression system” means an assembly of piping or conduit and associated components, beginning at the first joint or mechanical connection at the base of the system riser, whether public or private, that conveys water or other approved fire-suppressing agents to dispersal openings or devices to extinguish, control, or contain fire and to provide protection from exposure to fire or other products of combustion, including, but not limited to, wet and dry standpipes, deluge systems, water-mist systems, foam-water systems, standpipe with hose systems, fire pumps, water storage tanks, valves, meters, pressure-regulating devices, air compressors and air lines associated with a fire suppression system, releasing panels and associated supervisory devices, and other ancillary valves and appurtenances attached thereto that are necessary for system performance.(j) “Inspection” includes planned or emergency impairment inspections and obstruction investigations, which are visual examinations of a system or portion thereof to determine whether it is in operable condition and free of physical damage, or actions otherwise leading to the finding of impairments or obstructions requiring maintenance or repair. (k) “Installation” means the installation of new or the retrofitting, altering, or repairing of existing fire suppression systems, and includes those activities included within “work on a fire suppression system,” as defined in subdivision (v).(l) “Licensed C-16 Fire Protection Contractor” means a person who possesses a C-16 Fire Protection Contractor license issued by the Contractors State License Board. (m) “Maintenance” means the condition of repair that provides performance as originally planned.(n) “Multifamily residential certification” means a certification, pursuant to the requirements of this chapter, allowing individuals to perform the installation of fire suppression systems in multifamily residential structures only.(o) “Multifamily residential structure” means a residential occupancy with three or more dwelling units up to, and including, four stories in height.(p) “Registered apprentice fire sprinkler fitter” means an apprentice who has been enrolled in a State of California or federally approved sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program and issued a valid registered apprenticeship fire sprinkler fitter card by the State Fire Marshal.(q) “Registered fire sprinkler fitter card” means a card issued by the State Fire Marshal to sprinkler fitter apprentices or trainees upon approval of meeting the requirements in this chapter.(r) “Repair” means to restore to normal working condition or to fix damage.(s) “Safe-off” means to cause the sprinkler system to be isolated from the water supply due to the loss of the building or any other incident or need. (t) “Service” means to repair or test.(u) “Trainee” means a person who performs work on a fire suppression system at an entry-level position as described in this chapter who is not enrolled in a State of California or federally approved sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program but is issued a valid registered trainee fire sprinkler fitter card by the State Fire Marshal.(v) “Work on a fire suppression system” means the onsite layout, onsite fabrication, work and practice concerning the construction, installation, alteration, modification, repair, performance of safe-off, initial acceptance testing and inspection, planned or emergency impairment inspection, obstruction investigation, test, or performance of maintenance and service, on or of a fire suppression system. Article 3. General Requirements13191.3. (a) A person shall not engage in the installation, extension, alteration, repair, service, inspection, maintenance, safe-off, or investigation of internal piping condition and obstructions of, or add appurtenances to, water- or chemical-based fire suppression systems, or otherwise work on fire suppression systems, without first being certified or registered by the State Fire Marshal.(b) The prohibitions in subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following:(1) Installation, alteration, or repair of residential fire sprinkler systems in one- and two-family dwellings.(2) The installation, alteration, or repair of underground water supply lines from the connection of the water supply to the first joint, or mechanical connection at the base of the system riser.(3) Pre-engineered fixed extinguishing systems.(4) Fire suppression personnel, fire inspectors, or fire marshals inspecting or testing a fire suppression or standpipe system for the purposes of ensuring proper operation.(5) Monthly, quarterly, and annual inspections performed by persons in accordance with the applicable provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 901) of Division 1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations.(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person may perform an investigation of internal piping condition and obstructions of water-based fire suppression systems without first being certified or registered by the State Fire Marshal if the person meets both of the following criteria:(1) The person holds a valid certificate or license from a nationally recognized professional standards organization that requires the holder to successfully demonstrate having at least five years of experience in the inspection, testing, and maintenance of water-based fire suppression systems.(2) The person successfully passes a written examination on California-based regulations and a practical physical examination given by the professional standards organization described in paragraph (1). Article 4. Supervision13191.4. (a) A certified fire sprinkler fitter shall directly supervise the number of apprentices permitted in the applicable apprenticeship agreement and up to two trainees.(b) A licensed C-16 Fire Protection Contractor shall be responsible for ensuring the people it assigns to work on a fire suppression system are appropriately certified or registered and for ensuring compliance with the supervisor-to-apprentice ratios described in subdivision (a). Article 5. Fire Sprinkler Fitter Trainee Requirements13191.5. (a) A person not registered in a State of California or federally approved apprenticeship program shall be registered with the State Fire Marshal as a fire sprinkler fitter trainee and work within the scope of this chapter as a trainee for up to one year from their date of registration.(b) To be registered as a trainee, an applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Be 16 years of age or older.(2) Complete a fire sprinkler fitter trainee registration application, as developed by the State Fire Marshal, and pay the accompanying fees as prescribed in the applicable provisions of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 920) of Division 1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations.(3) Provide proof of employment with a licensed C-16 Fire Protection Contractor.(c) Upon verification of compliance with paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b), the State Fire Marshal shall issue the applicant a trainee registration card.(d) The trainee shall be registered into a State of California or federally approved fire sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program within one year of their date of registration as a trainee.(e) If the trainee is not accepted into a State of California or federally approved fire sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program within one year of their date of hire, the individual shall no longer be registered to work within the scope of this chapter. Article 6. Fire Sprinkler Fitter Apprentice Requirements13191.6. (a) To be registered as an apprentice, an applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Be 16 years of age or older.(2) Complete a fire sprinkler fitter apprentice registration application, as developed by the State Fire Marshal, and pay the accompanying fees prescribed in the applicable provisions of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 920) of Division 1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations.(3) Provide proof of acceptance into a State of California or federally approved fire sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program.(b) Upon verification of compliance with paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the State Fire Marshal shall issue an applicant an apprentice registration card.(c) A person possessing an apprentice registration shall only perform installation of a fire suppression system for a properly licensed C-16 Fire Protection Contractor.(d) A person registered as an apprentice shall perform tasks within the scope of this chapter and meet any additional apprenticeship program standards for the occupation of fire sprinkler fitter. Article 7. Fire Sprinkler Fitter Certification Requirements13191.7. (a) To be certified as a fire sprinkler fitter, an applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Be 16 years of age or older.(2) Complete a sprinkler fitter certification application, as developed by the State Fire Marshal, and pay the accompanying fees prescribed in the applicable provisions of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 920) of Division 1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations.(3) Provide one of the following:(A) Proof of completion of a State of California or federally approved fire sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program.(B) Proof of possession of a valid C-16 Fire Protection Contractor license issued by the Contractors State License Board.(4) Pass a written examination as developed or selected by the State Fire Marshal.(b) Upon verification of compliance with paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the State Fire Marshal shall issue a certified fire sprinkler fitter card.(c) A State of California or federally approved fire sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program shall consist of the following minimum time requirements:(1) For commercial certification, completion of a State of California or federally approved fire sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program, including a minimum of 7,000 hours with a minimum of five years of experience.(2) For a multifamily residential certification, completion of a State of California or federally approved fire sprinkler fitter apprenticeship program including a minimum of 3,500 hours with a minimum of two years of experience.(d) (1) Out-of-state applicants for commercial certification shall provide documentation that they have worked for at least 7,000 hours with a minimum of five years of experience.(2) Out-of-state applicants for a multifamily residential certification shall provide documentation that they have worked for at least 3,500 hours with a minimum of two years of experience within the scope of this chapter.(3) Training obtained through an out-of-state apprenticeship program shall be evaluated and approved by the State Fire Marshal using the California Division of Apprenticeship Standards - Minimum Industry Training Criteria (MITC) for Pipe Trades.(e) The State Fire Marshal shall compile trainee and apprentice registrations and fire sprinkler fitter certifications in a database designed to link the Automatic Extinguishing Systems Program to the State Fire Marshal’s internet website.(f) The State Fire Marshal may coordinate with the Department of Industrial Relation’s Division of Apprenticeship Standards while compiling data under this section for registered apprentices. Article 8. Continuing Education13191.8. (a) A certified fire sprinkler fitter shall successfully complete 30 hours of State Fire Marshal approved continuing education within a three-year period. (b) For purposes of the requirements of subdivision (a), one continuing education unit is equivalent to 10 hours of successfully completed training.(c) A maximum of 10 hours of safety-related instruction may count towards the 30-hour requirement described in subdivision (a). (d) The State Fire Marshal shall determine further requirements for continuing education for certified fire sprinkler fitters and providers of continuing education. Article 9. Enforcement13192. Upon receipt of a written complaint from the public alleging a violation of this chapter, the State Fire Marshal shall immediately notify the local fire authority having jurisdiction and request that the local jurisdiction investigate the complaint, unless the complaint relates to a project subject to the primary jurisdiction of the State Fire Marshal. If the local fire authority having jurisdiction refuses or fails to investigate as requested by the State Fire Marshal, the State Fire Marshal may investigate instead and take appropriate action regardless of geographical boundaries.13192.1. (a) The State Fire Marshal, its designee, or the authority otherwise having jurisdiction may inspect project worksites where work on fire suppression systems is performed to ensure that persons performing the work possess valid certifications or registrations as required by this chapter. The State Fire Marshal, its designee, or the authority otherwise having jurisdiction may require persons performing work to provide proof of possession of the applicable certification or registration card. A person who cannot show proof of certification or registration to the State Fire Marshal, its designee, or the authority otherwise having jurisdiction is subject to penalties.(b) Violations of this act shall be subject to penalties as determined by the State Fire Marshal, as described in the applicable provisions of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 920) of Division 1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations.13192.2. (a) If the State Fire Marshal, its designee, or the authority otherwise having jurisdiction determines that work on fire suppression systems is being performed in violation of this chapter and provides notice in accordance with Section 13192.3, the State Fire Marshal, its designee, or the authority otherwise having jurisdiction may subsequently issue a “stop work order,” as defined in Part 9 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.(b) After the issuance of a stop work order pursuant to subdivision (a), work within the scope of this chapter shall not resume until the State Fire Marshal, its designee, or the authority otherwise having jurisdiction complete a full investigation and verify that all work on the fire suppression system in question has been performed by duly authorized persons.(c) If an investigation determines that the work on a fire suppression system was not performed by those authorized, any pipe, riser, pump, or any other component thereof installed by an unauthorized person shall be subject to removal by the State Fire Marshal or the authority otherwise having jurisdiction.13192.3. (a) A person who violates this chapter shall be subject to a notice of violation or correction order issued by the State Fire Marshal, its designee, or the authority otherwise having jurisdiction that shall contain, at a minimum, the violator’s name, employer, certification or registration number, job location, date, and a description of the offense.(b) If the condition identified in a notice of violation or correction order is not corrected immediately upon issuance, the State Fire Marshal, its designee, or the authority otherwise having jurisdiction may issue a “stop work order,” as defined in Part 9 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.13192.4. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall implement provisions related to the administrative processes and fees for sprinkler fitter certifications and fire sprinkler fitter apprentice and trainee registrations described in the applicable provisions of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 920) of Division 1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations.(b) The State Fire Marshal shall penalize violators of this chapter pursuant to the applicable provisions of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 920) of Division 1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations.(c) (1) A violation of this chapter, or any order, rule, or regulation made pursuant to this chapter, is a misdemeanor. (2) A person who violates this chapter, or any order, rule, or regulation made pursuant to this chapter, shall be subject to the penalties described in Section 13112.(d) The State Fire Marshal may establish and collect fees no greater than the actual and reasonable costs necessary to implement this chapter, consistent with Section 3 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.